Utah statutes.
13-5a-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Control" means:
(a)  ownership of more than 5% of the voting shares or ownership interests of
an entity;
(b)  the power to vote more than 5% of the voting shares of an entity; or
(c)  the ability to influence the management of an entity.
(2)  "Cyber-terrorism" means:
(a)  the unlawful use of computing resources to intimidate or coerce others;
(b)  accessing a computer without authorization or exceeding authorized
access;
(c)  willfully communicating, delivering, or causing the transmission of a
program, information, code, or command without authorization or exceeding
authorized access;
(d)  intentionally or recklessly:
(i)  intends to defraud or materially cause damage or disruption to any
computing resources or to the owner of any computing resources; or
(ii)  intends to materially cause damage or disruption to any computing
resources indirectly through another party's computing resources.
(3)  "Depository institution" is as defined in Section 7-1-103.
(4) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (4)(b), "unfair competition" means
an intentional business act or practice that:
(i) (A)  is unlawful, unfair, or fraudulent; and
(B)  leads to a material diminution in value of intellectual property; and
(ii)  is one of the following:
(A)  cyber-terrorism;
(B)  infringement of a patent, trademark, or trade name;
(C)  a software license violation; or
(D)  predatory hiring practices.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (4)(a), "unfair competition" does not include
the departure and hiring of an employee by a competitor.
